Washington statutes.
RCW 36.78.060

Executive director.

The county road administration board shall appoint an executive director who shall be the chief administrative officer of the board and shall be responsible for carrying out the policies adopted by the board. The executive director is exempt from the provisions of state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, and shall serve at the pleasure of the county road administration board. The executive director's salary shall be set by the board.

[ 1990 c 266 s 1; 1965 ex.s. c 120 s 6.]